Utah statutes.
32A-12-205 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful sale or supply to interdicted persons.

(1)  A person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise furnish or supply any alcoholic beverage or product to any known interdicted person.

(2)  This section does not apply to the furnishing or supplying of an alcoholic beverage or product to an interdicted person upon the prescription of a physician, or administered by a physician, dentist, or hospital under this title.

